North Carolina, session 2025, SB319.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-150.7(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(7a) A procedure for continuing to provide services to a child who is placed into
an alternative learning program or alternative school pursuant to Article 8C of
this Chapter."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S319-v-1*